California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
All deeds heretofore and hereafter issued to any taxing agency, including taxing agencies which have their own system for the levying and collection of taxes, by reason of the delinquency of property taxes or assessments levied by any taxing agency or revenue district, shall be conclusively presumed to be valid unless held to be invalid in an appropriate proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction to determine the validity of the deed commenced within one year after the execution of the deed, or within one year after the effective date of this section, whichever is later. These proceedings may be prosecuted within the time limits specified above in the manner and subject to the provisions of Sections 3618 to 3636, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 830, Sec. 5.   Applicable July 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

177.

(a) A proceeding based on an alleged invalidity or irregularity of any deed heretofore or hereafter issued upon the sale of property by any taxing agency, including taxing agencies which have their own system for the levying and collection of taxes, in the enforcement of delinquent property taxes or assessments, or a proceeding based on an alleged invalidity or irregularity of any proceedings leading up to such deed, can only be commenced within one year after the date of recording of such deed in the county recorder’s office or within one year after June 1, 1954, whichever is later.

(b) A defense based on an alleged invalidity or irregularity of any deed heretofore or hereafter issued upon the sale of property by any taxing agency, including taxing agencies which have their own system for the levying and collection of taxes, in the enforcement of delinquent property taxes or assessments, or a defense based on an alleged invalidity or irregularity of any proceedings leading up to such deed, can only be maintained in a proceeding commenced within one year after the date of recording of such deed in the county recorder’s office or within one year after June 1, 1954, whichever is later.

(c) Sections 351 to 358, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure do not apply to the time within which a proceeding may be brought under the provisions of this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall operate to extend the time within which any proceeding based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any tax deed may be brought under any other section of this code.

(e) This section shall not apply to any deed issued by a taxing agency within five years from the time the property was sold to said taxing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1655.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Disaster Relief [181. - 191.]

181.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Eligible county” means a county which meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Has been proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of storms and floods occurring during February 1986.

(2) Has adopted an ordinance providing for property reassessment pursuant to Section 170.

(b) “Eligible property” means real property and any manufactured home which has received the homeowners’ exemption or is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption as of March 1, 1986, and which is located in an eligible county.

(c) “Property tax deferral claim” means a claim filed by the owner of eligible property in conjunction with or in addition to the filing of an application for reassessment of that property pursuant to Section 170, which enables the owner to defer payment of the April 10, 1986, installment of taxes on property on the regular secured roll for the 1985–86 fiscal year, as provided in Section 185.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

182.

On or before May 31, 1986, the tax collector of an eligible county shall certify to the Director of Finance the total amount of the second installment of property taxes on the regular secured roll for the 1985–86 fiscal year which are not paid by 5 p.m. on April 10, 1986, and which are delinquent, less the total amount of payments of that second installment received between April 10, 1986, and the date of the tax collector’s certification, and the delinquency percentage rate for property taxes on the regular secured roll for the 1982–83, 1983–84, and 1984–85 fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1110, Sec. 3.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

182.5.

If an eligible county has adopted an ordinance in accordance with Section 191, the tax collector shall certify to the Director of Finance on or before May 1, 1986, the total amount of supplemental roll property tax deferral claims submitted pursuant to Section 191 to the county by 5 p.m. on April 10, 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

183.

If the tax collector of an eligible county has certified to the Director of Finance the information specified in Section 182, the Director of Finance shall determine an amount for payment to the county which is equal to the amount of the second installment of property taxes on the regular secured roll for the 1985–86 fiscal year which is not paid by 5 p.m. on April 10, 1986, less a percentage of that amount which is equal to the average delinquency rate for property taxes on the regular secured roll for the immediately preceding three fiscal years. The Director of Finance shall certify the amount so determined to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification by the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

184.

If the tax collector of an eligible county has certified to the Director of Finance the information specified in Section 182.5, the Director of Finance shall certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification by the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

185.

(a) Any owner of eligible property who files on or before April 10, 1986, a claim for reassessment pursuant to the provisions of Section 170 based upon flood or storm damage occurring in February 1986 and amounting to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more under procedures set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 170, may apply to the county assessor to defer payment of the second installment of property taxes on the regular secured roll for the 1985–86 fiscal year with respect to that property which are due no later than April 10, 1986. If a timely claim is filed, the payment shall be deferred without penalty or interest until the assessor has reassessed the property and a corrected bill prepared pursuant to the provisions of Section 170 has been issued to the property owner. Taxes deferred pursuant to this section are due 30 days after the date the corrected tax bill is issued and if unpaid thereafter are delinquent as provided in Section 2610.5 and shall be subject to the penalty provided by law.

(b) If, following reassessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the assessor determines that an owner who applied and was granted a deferral of property taxes did not file a claim in good faith, the owner shall be assessed a delinquency penalty for the nonpayment of the deferred taxes.

(c) The provisions of this section do not apply to property taxes paid through impound accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1110, Sec. 4.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

187.

On or before December 31, 1986, each eligible county shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 183, less the amount of its property tax revenue lost in the 1985–86 fiscal year as a result of the reassessment pursuant to Section 170 of that property which was damaged or destroyed by the storms and floods of February 1986. If the amount computed pursuant to this section for an eligible county is less than zero, the Controller shall allocate that amount to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

187.5.

On or before December 31, 1986, each eligible county which has adopted an ordinance in accordance with Section 191, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 184, less the amount of its supplemental roll property tax revenue lost in the 1985–86 fiscal year as the result of reassessment pursuant to Section 170 of that property which was damaged or destroyed by the storms and floods of February 1986 and for which a deferral of supplemental roll property taxes was claimed pursuant to the ordinance adopted in accordance with Section 191.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

188.

The allocation of funds to and the repayment of funds by counties made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to review and audit by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1110, Sec. 5.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

188.5.

The Department of Finance and the Controller shall establish guidelines in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. These guidelines shall include a procedure for the review of claims submitted by an eligible county to the Department of Finance for allocations under this chapter. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, these standards shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

189.

Each eligible county shall make every reasonable effort to inform eligible property owners of the benefits provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 16, Sec. 3.   Effective March 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

It is the intent of this chapter to provide immediate tax relief where property was damaged during the February 1986 storms and floods and to ensure that local governments receive the property tax revenues necessary to carry out their operations in the 1985–86 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1110, Sec. 6.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

191.

Each eligible county may adopt an ordinance to permit the deferral of unpaid nondelinquent supplemental roll taxes on eligible property reassessed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0.5 which has sustained ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more in damage as the result of floods or storms occurring in February 1986 if the owner files a claim for deferral on or before April 10, 1986, with the assessor. The corrected supplemental bill shall be due on the last day of the month following the month in which the corrected bill is mailed or the delinquent date of the second installment of the original bill, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1110, Sec. 7.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Disaster Relief: Tax Deferral [194. - 196.99.]

194.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Eligible county” means a county that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Has been proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of emergency.

(2) Has adopted an ordinance providing property tax relief for disaster victims as provided in Section 170.

(b) “Eligible property” means real property and any manufactured home, including any new construction that was completed or any change in ownership that occurred prior to the date of the disaster that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Is located in an eligible county.

(2) Has sustained substantial disaster damage and the disaster resulted in the issuance of a state of emergency proclamation by the Governor.

“Eligible property” does not include any real property or any manufactured home, whether or not it otherwise qualifies as eligible property, if that real property or manufactured home was purchased or otherwise acquired by a claimant for relief under this chapter after the last date on which the disaster occurred.

(c) “Fair market value” means “full cash value” or “fair market value” as defined in Section 110.

(d) “Next property tax installment payment date” means December 10 or April 10, whichever date occurs first after the last date on which the eligible property was damaged.

(e) “Property tax deferral claim” means a claim filed by the owner of eligible property in conjunction with, or in addition to, the filing of an application for reassessment of that property pursuant to Section 170, that enables the owner to defer payment of the next installment of taxes on property on the regular secured roll for the current fiscal year, as provided in Section 194.1 or to defer payment of taxes on property on the supplemental roll for the current fiscal year, as provided in Section 194.9.

(f) “Substantial disaster damage,” as to real property located in a county declared to be a disaster by the Governor, means, with respect to real property and any manufactured home that has received the homeowners’ exemption or is eligible for the exemption as of the most recent lien date, damage amounting to at least 10 percent of its fair market value or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is less; and, with respect to other property, damage to the parcel of at least 20 percent of its fair market value immediately preceding the disaster causing the damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

194.1.

(a) Any owner of eligible property who files on or before the next property tax installment payment date, as defined in Section 194, a claim for reassessment pursuant to Section 170, or whose property is otherwise reassessed pursuant to Section 170, may, in conjunction with the claim for reassessment, apply to the county assessor to defer payment of that installment of property taxes on the regular secured roll for the current fiscal year with respect to that property which are due no later than that date which immediately follows the disaster which resulted in substantial disaster damage.

(b) If, pursuant to Section 170, a timely claim for deferral is filed,
 the payment shall be deferred without penalty or interest until one of the following occur:

(1) The assessor has reassessed the property and a corrected bill prepared pursuant to Section 170 has been sent to the property owner. Taxes on the corrected tax bill deferred pursuant to this paragraph are due and payable for the current year taxes on either December 10 for the first installment or April 10 for the second installment, or 30 days after the date that the bill is mailed or electronically transmitted to the owner, whichever is later. If the taxes on the corrected bill are unpaid thereafter, the taxes become delinquent as provided in Section 2610.5 and shall be subject to the penalty provided by law.

(2) The assessor has determined that the property is not eligible to
 be reassessed pursuant to Section 170, and the assessor has so notified the property owner. Taxes deferred pursuant to this paragraph are due and payable for the current year taxes on either December 10 for the first installment or April 10 for the second installment, or within 30 days of the latter of the date of mailing printed on the assessor’s notice or the postmark date on the assessor’s notice, whichever is later. If deferred taxes are unpaid thereafter, the taxes become delinquent as provided in Section 2610.5 and shall be subject to the penalty provided by law. 

(c) If, following reassessment pursuant to subdivision (a), the assessor determines that an owner who applied and was granted a deferral of property taxes did not file the claim in good faith, the owner shall be assessed a delinquency penalty for the nonpayment of the deferred taxes.

(d) This section does not apply
 to property taxes paid through impound accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (AB 3122)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

194.2.

On or before January 15 or May 15, whichever date is sooner, the tax collector of an eligible county shall certify to the Director of Finance the total amount of the most recent installment of property taxes for all eligible property on both the regular secured roll that were deferred pursuant to Section 194.1 or pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the eligible county pursuant to Section 195.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

194.3.

If an eligible county has adopted an ordinance in accordance with Section 194.9, the tax collector shall certify to the Director of Finance on or before January 31 or May 31, whichever date is sooner, the total amount of supplemental roll property tax deferral claims submitted pursuant to Section 194.9 to the county by 5 p.m. on the most recent property tax installment payment date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1507, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

194.4.

After the tax collector of an eligible county has certified an amount to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 194.2 or Section 194.3, the director shall, within 30 days and after verification, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification by the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

194.5.

On or before the December 31 or April 30 next following an eligible county’s receipt of an allocation pursuant to Section 194.4, whichever date is sooner, the eligible county shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount of that allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 387, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

194.8.

The allocation of funds to, and the repayment of funds by, counties made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to review and audit by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1507, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

194.9.

Each eligible county may adopt an ordinance to permit the deferral of unpaid nondelinquent current fiscal year supplemental roll taxes on eligible property reassessed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 75) of Part 0. 5 if the owner files with the assessor a claim for deferral on or before the next property tax installment payment date. Taxes deferred pursuant to this section shall be due on the last day of the month following the month in which the corrected bill is mailed or the delinquent date of the next installment of the original bill, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1507, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

195.

The Department of Finance shall establish guidelines in carrying out this chapter. These guidelines shall include a procedure for the review of claims submitted by an eligible county to the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1507, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

195.1.

Any eligible county may adopt an ordinance providing for the temporary postponement of the second consecutive installment of taxes on property on the regular secured roll until the next property tax installment payment date, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, also for the further postponement of the preceding installment of taxes on property on the regular secured roll which was deferred pursuant to Section 194.1, until that date. The state shall provide no reimbursement payments to local jurisdictions for the postponement of property taxes pursuant to this section, unless the Governor specifies otherwise in the proclamation of the emergency with respect to which the postponement was implemented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 387, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

195.2.

In the 1991–92 fiscal year or as soon as possible thereafter during the 1992–93 fiscal year, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of the floods that occurred in California in February 1992, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for that fiscal year resulting from the reassessment of eligible properties by the county assessor pursuant to Section 170, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts), county offices of education, and community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.3.

After the county auditor of an eligible county described in Section 195.2 has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 195.2, the director shall, within 30 days and after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 2.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.4.

On or before December 31, 1992, each eligible county described in Section 195.2 shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.3, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost in the immediately preceding fiscal year on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to eligible properties as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid districts), county offices of education, and community college districts. If the amount computed pursuant to this section for an eligible county is less than zero, the Controller shall allocate that amount to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 3.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.5.

In the 1991–92 fiscal year or as soon as possible thereafter, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of the earthquakes that occurred in California in April 1992, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 1992–93 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment of eligible properties by the county assessor pursuant to Section 170, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts), county offices of education, and community college districts. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.6.

After the county auditor of an eligible county described in Section 195.5 has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 195.5, the director shall, within 30 days and after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.7.

On or before December 31, 1993, each eligible county described in Section 195.5 shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.6, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost in the 1992–93 fiscal year on the regular secured roll and on the supplemental roll, with respect to eligible properties as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts), county offices of education, and community college districts. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution. If the amount computed pursuant to this section for an eligible county is less than zero, the Controller shall allocate that amount to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

195.71.

In the 1993–94 fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, and Ventura, on or after January 17 in 1994, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for that fiscal year resulting from the reassessment of eligible properties by the county assessor pursuant to Section 170, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.   Effective March 15, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

195.72.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.71, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to Section 195.71, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   Effective March 15, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

195.73.

On or before December 31, 1995, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.71, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.71, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost in the 1993–94 fiscal year on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to eligible properties as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the 1993–94 fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.72, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

195.77.

In the 1996–97 fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of storm, flooding, or any other related casualty that occurred in that county during December 1996 or January 1997, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 1996–97 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 1.   Effective August 25, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

195.78.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.77, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that same section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 2.   Effective August 25, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

195.79.

On or before July 1, 1998, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.77, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.78, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.77 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.78, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 3.   Effective August 25, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

195.80.

In the 1997–98 fiscal year, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of storm, flooding, or any other related casualty that occurred in that county during February 1998, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 1997–98 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 749, Sec. 1.   Effective September 23, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

195.81.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.80, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 749, Sec. 2.   Effective September 23, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

195.82.

On or before June 30, 1999, each eligible county, as described in Section 195.80, shall compute and remit to the Controller for deposit in the General Fund an amount equal to the amount allocated to it by the Controller pursuant to Section 195.81, less the actual amount of its property tax revenue lost on the regular secured and supplemental rolls with respect to those eligible properties described in Section 195.80 as a result of the reassessment of those properties pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170, excluding any property tax revenue lost by school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. If the actual amount of property tax revenue lost by an eligible county in the immediately preceding fiscal year, as described and limited in the preceding sentence, exceeds the amount allocated by the Controller to that county pursuant to Section 195.81, the Controller shall allocate the amount of that excess to that eligible county. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

195.83.

In the 1998–99 fiscal year, the county auditor of an eligible county, proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster as a result of a freeze or any other related casualty that occurred in that county during the winter of 1998–99, shall certify to the Director of Finance an estimate of the total amount of the reduction in property tax revenues on both the regular secured roll and the supplemental roll for the 1998–99 fiscal year resulting from the reassessment by the county assessor pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170 of those properties that are eligible properties as a result of that disaster, except that the amount certified shall not include any estimated property tax revenue reductions to school districts (other than basic state aid school districts) and county offices of education. For purposes of this section, “basic state aid school district” means any school district that does not receive a state apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42238 of the Education Code, but receives from the state only a basic apportionment pursuant to Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   Effective July 26, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

195.84.

After the county auditor of an eligible county, as described in Section 195.83, has made the applicable certification to the Director of Finance pursuant to that section, the director shall, within 30 days after verification of the county auditor’s estimate, certify this amount to the Controller for allocation to the county. Upon receipt of certification from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make the appropriate allocation to the county within 10 working days thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 165, Sec. 2.   Effective July 26, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

195.85.
